Hawaii statutes.
C. Residential Uses

Cross References

Civil relief for state military forces, see chapter 657D.

§171-45 Residence lots; sale or leases.
The board may dispose of public land for personal residence purposes (1) by
sale in fee simple or lease at public auction as provided in sections 171-14
and 171-16, or (2) by sale or lease of lots by drawing as provided in sections
171-15 and 171-16. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; Supp, §103A-43; HRS §171-45; am L
1970, c 184, §1]

Cross References

Oahu land development, see chapter 206.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next